Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2105
Director; agreements with federal government; execute.

The Director of Agriculture is further authorized to enter into an agreement or agreements with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States to use the assets and funds received under sections 2-2101 to 2-2107 to carry out the provisions of the Bankhead-Jones Farm Tenant Act, enacted by the Congress of the United States, and in accordance with the applicable provisions thereof.

Laws 1951, c. 4, § 5, p. 66.